Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.040

Physical education in grades one through eight.

Every pupil attending grades one through eight of the public schools shall receive instruction in physical education as prescribed by rule of the superintendent of public instruction: PROVIDED, That individual pupils or students may be excused on account of physical disability, religious belief, or participation in directed athletics.

[ 2006 c 263 s 415; 1984 c 52 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.05.030. Prior: 1919 c 89 s 1; RRS s 4682. Formerly RCW 28A.05.030, 28.05.030.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.